Illinois, session 104th, HB3545.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Transportation Law of the 5Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding 6Section 2705-627 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2705/2705-627 new)8    Sec. 2705-627. Snow fence pilot program. The Department 9shall create a 5-year pilot program to reimburse farmers to 10leave a row of corn as snow fences. The Department shall 11establish rules and procedures, including limiting the number 12of farmers eligible to participate in the program. The 13Department shall pay the landowner or farmer based on its 14assumed yield. The price per bushel shall be determined using 15the statewide average cash prince on August 1 each year plus $2 16per bushel. Agreements under this Section may only go from 17Fall to Spring, but may be renewed every year.